Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0666.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2. (1) The department shall do the following: (a) Review and study all information available within any agency or department of state government to determine the body of relevant information regarding the relevant to establishing in this state of a production facility for an alternative fuel in this state. (b) Compile, in written or electronic format, information in a concise and readable form regarding the procedures for preparing and executing applications and approvals necessary for the establishing of a production facility for alternative fuels. (c) Publish and make available to the public, in written or electronic format, the information described in subdivision (b) in separate categories for biodiesel fuel, ethanol, and other categories of alternative fuels. (2) As part of the function described in subsection (1), the department shall specifically indicate procedures and processes that are housed in the department of environmental quality, environment, Great Lakes, and energy, the department of labor and economic growth, opportunity, and the Michigan economic development corporation.bureau of fair competition and free enterprise created in section 7 of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act. (3) The department may identify mechanisms that promote effective communication and coordination of efforts between this state and local governments, private industry, and institutions of higher education concerning the investigation, research into, and promotion of alternative fuels. (4) The department may also review any state regulation that may hinder the use, research, and development of alternative fuels and vehicles that are able to utilize them and recommend changes to the governor and to the legislature. Sec. 3. Except as otherwise provided by law and so far as if compatible with other duties, the department of environmental quality, environment, Great Lakes, and energy, the department of labor and economic growth, opportunity, and the Michigan economic development corporation bureau of fair competition and free enterprise created in section 7 of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act shall give the department any necessary assistance requested by the department for the fulfillment of its duties under this act. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 631 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.